New Jersey, session 221, A1608.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section)  a.  A structure used or intended for use wholly or in part for school instructional purposes shall be equipped with a carbon monoxide sensor device or devices, unless it is determined that there is no potential carbon monoxide hazard in the structure. The placement of such device and any determination that such device is not required shall be made in accordance with rules adopted by the Commissioner of Community Affairs. b.    The Commissioner of Community Affairs shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to its rule-making authority under the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) in order to effectuate subsection a. of this section. c.    For the purposes of this section: Carbon monoxide sensor device means a carbon monoxide alarm or detector that bears the label of a nationally recognized testing laboratory, and has been tested and listed as complying with the most recent Underwriters Laboratories standard 2034 or its equivalent. School means any public or private school as those terms are defined in N.J.S.18A:1-1. 2.    (New section)  The local governing body having jurisdiction over the enforcing agency for the uniform fire safety code adopted pursuant to the Uniform Fire Safety Act, P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-192 et seq.) or, if the Department of Community Affairs is the enforcing agency, the Commissioner of Community Affairs may establish a fee which covers the cost of inspection and of issuance of a certificate evidencing compliance with section 1 of P.L.    , c.     (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); provided, however, the fee authorized shall not exceed the costs of inspection and issuance of a certificate. 3.    (New section)  a.  An application for a construction permit for a structure intended for use wholly or in part for school instructional purposes shall not be declared complete by the enforcing agency without containing provisions for the placement of a carbon monoxide sensor device or devices, unless it is determined that there is no potential carbon monoxide hazard in the structure.  The placement of such device and any determination that such device is not required shall be made in accordance with rules adopted by the Commissioner of Community Affairs. b.    The Commissioner of Community Affairs shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to its rule-making authority under the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) in order to effectuate subsection a. of this section. c.    For the purposes of this section: Carbon monoxide sensor device means a carbon monoxide alarm or detector that bears the label of a nationally recognized testing laboratory, and has been tested and listed as complying with the most recent Underwriters Laboratories standard 2034 or its equivalent. School means any public or private school as those terms are defined in N.J.S.18A:1-1. 4.    Section 6 of P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-124) is amended to read as follows: 6.    The commissioner shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to effectuate the purposes of this act, including, but not limited to, the following powers in addition to all others granted by this act: a.    To adopt, amend and repeal, after consultation with the code advisory board, rules: (1) relating to the administration and enforcement of this act and (2) the qualifications or licensing, or both, of all persons employed by enforcing agencies of the State to enforce this act or the code, except that, plumbing inspectors shall be subject to the rules adopted by the commissioner only insofar as such rules are compatible with such rules and regulations, regarding health and plumbing for public and private buildings, as may be promulgated by the Public Health Council in accordance with Title 26 of the Revised Statutes. b.    To enter into agreements with federal and State of New Jersey agencies, after consultation with the code advisory board, to provide insofar as practicable (1) single-agency review of construction plans and inspection of construction and (2) intergovernmental acceptance of such review and inspection to avoid unnecessary duplication of effort and fees.  The commissioner shall have the power to enter into such agreements although the federal standards are not identical with State standards; provided that the same basic objectives are met.  The commissioner shall have the power through such agreements to bind the State of New Jersey and all governmental entities deriving authority therefrom. c.    To take testimony and hold hearings relating to any aspect of or matter relating to the administration or enforcement of this act, including but not limited to prospective interpretation of the code so as to resolve inconsistent or conflicting code interpretations, and, in connection therewith, issue [subpena] subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of evidence. The commissioner may designate one or more hearing examiners to hold public hearings and report on such hearings to the commissioner. d.    To encourage, support or conduct, after consultation with the code advisory board, educational and training programs for employees, agents and inspectors of enforcing agencies, either through the Department of Community Affairs or in cooperation with other departments of State government, enforcing agencies, educational institutions, or associations of code officials. e.    To study the effect of this act and the code to ascertain their effect upon the cost of building construction and maintenance, and the effectiveness of their provisions for insuring the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the State of New Jersey. f.     To make, establish and amend, after consultation with the code advisory board, such rules as may be necessary, desirable or proper to carry out his powers and duties under this act. g.    To adopt, amend, and repeal rules and regulations providing for the charging of and setting the amount of fees for the following code enforcement services, licenses or approvals performed or issued by the department, pursuant to the "State Uniform Construction Code Act," P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-119 et seq.): (1)  Plan review, construction permits, certificates of occupancy, demolition permits, moving of building permits, elevator permits and sign permits; and (2)  Review of applications for and the issuance of licenses certifying an individual's qualifications to act as a construction code official, subcode official or assistant under this act. (3)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1983, c.338). h.    To adopt, amend and repeal rules and regulations providing for the charging of and setting the amount of construction permit surcharge fees to be collected by the enforcing agency and remitted to the department to support those activities which may be undertaken with moneys credited to the Uniform Construction Code Revolving Fund. i.     To adopt, amend and repeal rules and regulations providing for: (1)  Setting the amount of and the charging of fees to be paid to the department by a private agency for the review of applications for and the issuance of approvals authorizing a private agency to act as an on-site inspection and plan review agency or an in-plant inspection agency; (2)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2005, c.212). (3)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2005, c.212). j.     To enforce and administer the provisions of the "State Uniform Construction Code Act," P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-119 et seq.) and the code promulgated thereunder, and to prosecute or cause to be prosecuted violators of the provisions of that act or the code promulgated thereunder in administrative hearings and in civil proceedings in State and local courts. k.    To monitor the compliance of local enforcing agencies with the provisions of the "State Uniform Construction Code Act," P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-119 et seq.), to order corrective action as may be necessary where a local enforcing agency is found to be failing to carry out its responsibilities under that act, to supplant or replace the local enforcing agency for a specific project, and to order it dissolved and replaced by the department where the local enforcing agency repeatedly or habitually fails to enforce the provisions of the "State Uniform Construction Code Act." l.     To adopt, amend, and repeal rules and regulations implementing the provisions of P.L.1999, c.15, P.L.2003, c.44, [and] section 1 of P.L.2015, c.146 (C.52:27D-123f) , and sections 1 through 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) concerning the installation and maintenance of carbon monoxide sensors. (cf: P.L.2015, c.146, s.2) 5.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following the date of enactment, but the Commissioner of Community Affairs may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.